en: Wear eye/face protection, S39
cs: Používejte osobní ochranné prostředky pro oči a obličej, S39
de: Schutzbrille/Gesichtsschutz tragen, S39
dk: Brug beskyttelsesbriller/ansigtsskærm under arbejdet, S39
el: Χρησιµοποιείτε συσκευή προστασίας µατιών/προσώπου, S39
es: Úsese protección para los ojos/la cara, S39
et: Kanda silmade/näokaitset, S39
fi: Käytettävä silmien- tai kasvonsuojainta, S39
fr: Porter un appareil de protection des yeux/du visage, S39
hu: Szem-/arcvédőt kell viselni, S39
it: Proteggersi gli occhi/la faccia, S39
lt: Naudoti akių (veido) apsaugos priemones, S39
lv: Valkāt acu vai sejas aizsargu, S39
mt: Ipproteġi 'l għajnejk/wiċċek, S39
nl: Een bescherming voor de ogen/voor het gezicht dragen, S39
no: Bruk vernebriller/ansiktsjerm, S39
pl: Nosić okulary lub ochronę twarzy, S39
pt: Usar um equipamento protector para os olhos/face, S39
sk: Použite ochranu očí a tváre, S39
sl: Nositi zaščito za oči/obraz, S39
sv: Använd skyddsglasögon eller ansiktsskydd, S39

en: Keep away from living quarters, S4
cs: Uchovávejte mimo obytné objekty, S4
de: Von Wohnplätzen fernhalten, S4
dk: Må ikke opbevares i nærheden af beboelse, S4
el: Μακριά από κατοικηµένους χώρους, S4
es: Manténgase lejos de locales habitados, S4
et: Mitte hoida eluruumides, S4
fi: Ei saa säilyttää asuintiloissa, S4
fr: Conserver à l'écart de tout local d'habitation, S4
hu: Lakóterülettől távol tartandó, S4
it: Conservare lontano da locali di abitazione, S4
lt: Nelaikyti gyvenamosiose patalpose, S4
lv: Neuzglabāt dzīvojamās telpās, S4
mt: Żomm 'il bogħod minn postijiet ta' abitazzjoni, S4
nl: Verwijderd van woonruimten opbergen, S4
no: Må ikke oppbevares i nærheten av bolighus, S4
pl: Nie przechowywać w pomieszczeniach mieszkalnych, S4
pt: Manter fora de qualquer zona de habitação, S4
sk: Uchovávajte mimo obývaných priestorov, S4
sl: Hraniti izven bivališč, S4
sv: Förvaras avskilt från bodstadsutrymmen, S4

de: Fußboden und verunreinigte Gegenstände mit… reinigen (Material vom Hersteller anzugeben), S40
en: To clean the floor and all objects contaminated by this material\, use … (to be specified by the manufacturer), S40
cs: Podlahy a předměty znečistěné tímto materiálem čistěte…(specifikuje výrobce), S40
dk: Gulvet og tilsmudsede genstande renses med… (midlerne angives af fabrikanten), S40
el: Για τον καθαρισµό του δαπέδου και όλων των αντικειµένων που έχουν µολυνθεί από το υλικό αυτό χρησιµοποιείτε… (το είδος καθο- ρίζεται από τον παραγωγό), S40
es: Para limpiar el suelo y los objetos contaminados por este producto\, úsese… (a especificar por el fabricante), S40
et: Kemikaaliga saastunud pindade ja esemete puhastamiseks kasuta… (määrab valmistaja), S40
fi: Kemikaali puhdistettava pinnoilta käyttäen… (kemikaalin ilmoittaa valmistaja/mahaantuoja), S40
fr: Pour nettoyer le sol ou les objets souillés par ce produit\, utiliser.. [à préciser par le fabricant], S40
hu: A padlót és a beszennyeződött tárgyakat… -val/-vel kell tisztítani (az anyagot a gyártó határozza meg), S40
it: Per pulire il pavimento e gli oggetti contaminati da questo prodotto\, usare… (da precisare da parte del produttore), S40
lt: Šia medžiaga užterštus daiktus ir grindis valyti su… (kuo — nurodo gamintojas), S40
lv: Tīrot grīdu un piesārnotos objektus\, izmantot… (norāda ražotājs), S40
mt: Biex taħsel l-art u l-oġġetti kollha mniġġsin b'dan il-materjal\, uża… (ikun speċifikat mill-manifattur), S40
nl: Voor de reiniging van de vloer en alle voorwerpen verontreinigd met dit materiaal\,… gebruiken (aan te geven door de fabrikant), S40
no: Gulv og tilsølte gjenstander rengjøres med… (angis av produsent eller importør), S40
pl: Czyścić podłogę i wszystkie inne obiekty zanieczyszczone tym produktem… (środkiem wskazanym przez producenta), S40
pt: Para limpeza do chão e objectos contaminados por este produto\, utilizar… (a especificar pelo produtor), S40
sk: Na vyčistenie podlahy a všetkých predmetov kontaminovaných týmto materiálom použite… (špecifikuje výrobca), S40
sl: Tla in predmete\, onesnažene s to snovjo/pripravkom\, očistiti s/z… (čistilo določi proizvajalec), S40
sv: Golv och förorenade föremål tvättas med… (anges av tillverkaren), S40

de: Fußboden und verunreinigte Gegenstände mit viel Wasser reinigen, S40.1
en: To clean the floor and all objects contaminated by this material\, use plenty of water, S40.1
dk: Gulvet og tilsmudsede genstande renses med rigelig vand, S40.1
es: Para limpiar el suelo y los objetos contaminados por este producto\, úsese mucho aqua, S40.1
fi: Aine puhdistettava pinnoilta käyttäen paljon vettä, S40.1
fr: Pour nettoyer le sol ou les objets souillés par ce produit\, utiliser beaucoup d'eau, S40.1
it: Per pulire il pavimento e gli oggetti contaminati da questo prodotto\, usare abbondante acqua, S40.1
nl: Voor de reiniging van de vloer en alle voorwerpenverontreinigd met dit materiaal\, veel water gebruiken, S40.1
no: Gulv og tilsølte gjenstander rengjøres med vann, S40.1
pt: Para limpeza do chão e objectos contaminados por este produto\, utilizar muita água, S40.1
sv: För rengöring av ämnet på ytor\, använd mycket vatten, S40.1

de: Fußboden und verunreinigte Gegenstände mit verdünnter Lauge reinigen, S40.2
en: To clean the floor and all objects contaminated by this material\, use diluted alcaline solution, S40.2
dk: Gulvet og tilsmudsede genstande renses med fortyndet lud, S40.2
es: Para limpiar el suelo y los objetos contaminados por este producto\, úsese lejía diluída, S40.2
fi: Aine puhdistettava pinnoilta käyttäen laimennettua emästä, S40.2
fr: Pour nettoyer le sol ou les objets souillés par ce produit\, utiliser une lessive diluée, S40.2
it: Per pulire il pavimento e gli oggetti contaminati da questo prodotto\, usare soluzione alcalina diluita, S40.2
nl: Voor de reiniging van de vloer en alle voorwerpenverontreinigd met dit materiaal\, verdunde loogoplossing gebruiken, S40.2
no: Gulv og tilsølte gjenstander rengjøres med fortynnet lut, S40.2
pt: Para limpeza do chão e objectos contaminados por este produto\, utilizar lixívia diluída, S40.2
sv: För rengöring av ämnet på ytor\, använd utspädd bas, S40.2

de: Fußboden und verunreinigte Gegenstände mit Jodkohle reinigen, S40.3
en: To clean the floor and all objects contaminated by this material\, use iodized active carbon, S40.3
dk: Gulvet og tilsmudsede genstande renses med jodholdigt aktiv kul, S40.3
es: Para limpiar el suelo y los objetos contaminados por este producto\, úsese carbón yodado, S40.3
fi: Aine puhdistettava pinnoilta käyttäen jodihiiltä, S40.3
fr: Pour nettoyer le sol ou les objets souillés par ce produit\, utiliser de l'iodure de carbone, S40.3
it: Per pulire il pavimento e gli oggetti contaminati da questo prodotto\, usare carbone attivo iodato, S40.3
nl: Voor de reiniging van de vloer en alle voorwerpenverontreinigd met dit materiaal\, joodkool gebruiken, S40.3
no: Gulv og tilsølte gjenstander rengjøres med jodkull, S40.3
pt: Para limpeza do chão e objectos contaminados por este produto\, utilizar carvão activo iodado, S40.3
sv: För rengöring av ämnet på ytor\, använd jodkol, S40.3

de: Explosions- und Brandgase nicht einatmen, S41
en: In case of fire and/or explosion do not breathe fumes, S41
cs: V případě požáru nebo výbuchu nevdechujte dýmy, S41
dk: Undgå at indånde røgen ved brand eller eksplosion, S41
el: Σε περίπτωση πυρκαγιάς και/ή εκρήξεως µην αναπνέετε τους καπνούς, S41
es: En caso de incendio y/o de explosión no respire los humos, S41
et: Tulekahju ja/või plahvatuse korral vältida suitsu sissehingamist, S41
fi: Vältettävä palamisessa tai räjähdyksessä muodostuvan savun hengittämistä, S41
fr: En cas d'incendie et/ou d'explosion\, ne pas respirer les fumées, S41
hu: Robbanás és/vagy tűz esetén a keletkező gázokat nem szabad belélegezni, S41
it: In caso di incendio e/o esplosione non respirare i fumi, S41
lt: Gaisro arba sprogimo atveju neįkvėpti dūmų, S41
lv: Ugunsgrēka vai eksplozijas gadījumā neieelpot dūmus, S41
mt: F'każ ta' nar jew/u splużjoni tiblax id-dħaħen, S41
nl: In geval van brand en/of explosie inademen van rook vermijden, S41
no: Unngå innånding av røyken som oppstår ved brann eller eksplosjon, S41
pl: Nie wdychać dymów powstających w wyniku pożaru lub wybuchu, S41
pt: Em caso de incêndio e/ou explosão não respirar os fumos, S41
sk: V prípade požiaru alebo výbuchu nevdychujte vý pary, S41
sl: Ne vdihavati plinov\, ki nastanejo ob požaru in/ali eksploziji, S41
sv: Undvik inandning av rök vid brand eller explosion, S41

de: Beim Räuchern/Versprühen geeignetes Atemschutzgerät anlegen (geeignete Bezeichnung(en) vom Hersteller anzugeben), S42
en: During fumigation/spraying wear suitable respiratory equipment (appropriate wording to be specified by the manufacturer), S42
cs: Při fumigaci nebo rozprašování používejte vhodný ochranný prostředek k ochraně dý chacích orgánů (specifikaci uvede vý robce), S42
dk: Brug egnet åndedrætsværn ved rygning/sprøjtning (den eller de pågældende betegnelser angives af fabrikanten), S42
el: Κατά τη διάρκεια υποκαπνισµού/ψεκάσµατος χρησιµοποιείτε κατάλ- ληλη αναπνευστική συσκευή (η κατάλληλη διατύπωση καθορίζεται από τον παραγωγό), S42
es: Durante las fumigaciones/pulverizaciones\, úsese equipo respiratorio adecuado [denominación(es) adecuada(s) a especificar por el fabricante), S42
et: Suitsutamisel/piserdamisel kanda sobivat hingamiselundite kaitsevahendit (sõnastuse täpsustab valmistaja), S42
fi: Kaasutuksen/ruiskutuksen aikana käytettävä sopivaa hengityksensuojainta (oikean sanamuodon valitsee valmistaja/maahantuoja), S42
fr: Pendant les fumigations/pulvérisations\, porter un appareil respiratoire approprié [terme(s) approprié(s) à indiquer par le fabricant], S42
hu: Füst-/permetképződés esetén megfelelő légzőkészüléket kell viselni (a megfelelő szöveget a gyártó határozza meg), S42
it: Durante le fumigazioni/polimerizzazioni usare un apparecchio respiratorio adatto (termine(i) appropriato(i) da precisare da parte del produttore), S42
lt: Purškiant (fumiguojant) naudoti tinkamas kvėpavimo takų apsaugos priemones (konkrečiai nurodo gamintojas), S42
lv: Izsmidzināšanas laikā izmantot šādus elpošanas ceļu aizsardzības līdzekļus… (norāda ražotājs), S42
mt: Waqt il-fumigazzjoni/l-isprejjar ilbes apparat respiratorju adatt (it-terminu adattat irid ikun speċifikat mill-manifattur), S42
nl: Tijdens de ontsmetting/bespuiting een geschikte adembescherming dragen (geschikte term(en) door de fabrikant aan te geven), S42
no: Bruk egnet åndrettsvern ved utgassing/sprøyting, S42
pl: Podczas fumigacji/rozpylania/natryskiwania stosować odpowiednie środki ochrony dróg oddechowych (rodzaj określi producent), S42
pt: Durante as fumigações/pulverizações usar equipamento respiratório adequado [termo(s) adequado(s) a indicar pelo produtor], S42
sk: Počas zadymovania/rozprašovania použite vhodný respirátor (špecifikuje výrobca), S42
sl: Med zaplinjanjem/razprševanjem nositi primerno dihalno opremo (natančnejše pogoje določi proizvajalec), S42
sv: Använd lämpligt andningsskydd vid gasning/sprutning (specificeras av tillverkaren), S42

de: Beim Räuchern geeignetes Atemschutzgerät anlegen, S42.1
en: During fumigation wear suitable respiratory equipment, S42.1
dk: Brug egnet åndedrætsværn ved rygning, S42.1
es: Durante las fumigaciones úsese equipo respiratorio adecuado, S42.1
fi: Kaasutuksen aikana käytettävä sopivaa hengityksensuojainta, S42.1
fr: Pendant les fumigations\, porter un appareil respiratoire approprié, S42.1
it: Durante le fumigazioni usare un apparecchio respiratorio adatto, S42.1
nl: Tijdens de ontsmetting een geschikt ademhalingstoestel dragen, S42.1
no: Bruk egnet åndrettsvern ved utgassing, S42.1
pt: Durante as fumigaçoes usar equipamento respiratório adequado, S42.1
sv: Använd lämpligt andningsskydd vid förgasning, S42.1

de: Beim Versprühen geeignetes Atemschutzgerät anlegen, S42.2
en: During spraying wear suitable respiratory equipment, S42.2
dk: Brug egnet åndedrætsværn ved sprøjtning, S42.2
es: Durante las pulverizaciones úsese equipo respiratorio adecuado, S42.2
fi: Ruiskutuksen aikana käytettävä sopivaa hengityksensuojainta, S42.2
fr: Pendant les pulvérisations\, porter un appareil respiratoire approprié, S42.2
it: Durante le polimerizzazioni usare un apparecchio respiratorio adatto, S42.2
nl: Tijdens de bespuiting een geschikt ademhalingstoestel dragen, S42.2
no: Bruk egnet åndrettsvern ved sprøyting, S42.2
pt: Durante as pulverizaçoes usar equipamento respiratório adequado, S42.2
sv: Använd lämpligt andningsskydd vid sprutning, S42.2

de: Zum Löschen … (vom Hersteller anzugeben) verwenden. (Wenn Wasser die Gefahr erhöht\, anfügen: \"Kein Wasser verwenden\".), S43
en: In case of fire\, use… (indicate in the space the precise type of fire-fighting equipment. If water increases risk\, add \"Never use water\"), S43
cs: V případě požáru použijte… (uved’te zde konkrétní typ hasicího zařízení. Pokud zvyšuje riziko voda\, připojte \"Nikdy nepoužívat vodu\"), S43
dk: Brug… ved brandslukning (den nøjagtige type brandslukningsudstyr angives af fabrikanten. Såfremt vand ikke må bruges tilføjes: \"Brug ikke vand\"), S43
el: Σε περίπτωση πυρκαγιάς χρησιµοποιείτε… (Αναφέρεται το ακριβές είδος µέσων πυρόσβεσης. Εάν το νερό αυξάνει τον κίνδυνο\, προστίθεται: \"Μη χρησιµοποιείτε ποτέ νερό\"), S43
es: En caso de incendio\, utilizar… (los medios de extinción los debe especificar el fabricante). (Si el agua aumenta el riesgo\, se deberá añadir: \"No usar nunca agua\"), S43
et: Tulekahju korral kasutada… (näidata täpne kustutusvahendi tüüp. Kui vesi suurendab ohtu\, lisada: Vett mitte kasutada), S43
fi: Sammutukseen käytettävä… (ilmoitettava sopiva sammutusmenetelmä. Jos vesi lisää vaaraa\, lisättävä sanat: Sammutukseen ei saa käyttää vettä), S43
fr: En cas d'incendie\, utiliser… (moyens d'extinction à préciser par le fabricant. Si l'eau augmente les risques\, ajouter: \"Ne jamais utiliser d'eau\"), S43
hu: Tűz esetén… -val/-vel oltandó (az anyagot a gyártó határozza meg). Ha a víz használata fokozza a veszélyt\, a \"Víz használata tilos.\" mondattal is ki kell egészíteni, S43
it: In caso di incendio usare… (mezzi estinguenti idonei da indicarsi da parte del fabbricante. Se l'acqua aumenta il rischio precisare \"Non usare acqua\"), S43
lt: Gaisrui gesinti naudoti… (tiksliai nurodyti gesinimo priemonę. Jeigu vanduo didina riziką\, papildomai nurodyti \"Nenaudoti vandens\"), S43
lv: Ugunsgrēka gadījumā izmantot… (precīzi norādīt nepieciešamo ugunsdzēsības līdzekli. Ja ūdens palielina risku\, papildināt ar norādi \"Aizliegts izmantot ūdeni\"), S43
mt: F'każ ta' nar uża… (indika fl-ispazju t-tip preċiż ta' apparat tat-tifi tan-nar. Jekk l-ilma jkabbar ir-riskju\, żid \"Qatt tuża l-ilma\"), S43
nl: In geval van brand… gebruiken (blusmiddelen aan te duiden door de fabrikant. Indien water het risico vergroot toevoegen: \"Nooit water gebruiken\"), S43
no: Ved brannslukking bruk… Hvis bruk av vann øker faren\, føy till \"Bruk ikke vann\", S43
pl: W przypadku pożaru używać… (podać rodzaj sprzętu przeciwpożarowego. Jeżeli woda zwiększa zagrożenie\, dodać… Nigdy nie używać wody), S43
pt: Em caso de incêndio\, utilizar… (meios de extinção a especificar pelo produtor. Se a água aumentar os riscos\, acrescentar \"Nunca utilizar água\"), S43
sk: V prípade požiaru použite… (uved’te presný typ hasiaceho prístroja). (Ak voda zvyšuje riziko\, dodajte – \"Nikdy nehaste vodou\"), S43
sl: Za gašenje uporabiti… (natančno navesti vrsto gasila in opreme za gašenje. Če voda povečuje nevarnost\, dodati: \"Neuporabljati vode!\"), S43
sv: Vid brandsläckning använd… (ange lämplig metod. Om vatten ökar riskerna\, lägg till: \"Anväd aldrigvatten\"), S43

de: Zum Löschen Sand\, Erde\, Pulver oder Schaum verwenden, S43.1
en: For extinguishing\, use sand\, earth\, powder or foam, S43.1
dk: Brug sand\, jord\, pulver eller skum ved brandslukning, S43.1
es: Para extinguir utilizar arena\, tierra\, polvo o espuma, S43.1
fi: Sammutukseen käytettävä hiekkaa\, multaa\, pulveria tai vaahtoa, S43.1
fr: Pour éteindre\, utiliser du sable\, de la terre\, de la poudre ou de la mousse, S43.1
it: Per spegnere usare sabbia\, terra\, polvere o schiuma, S43.1
nl: Gebruik zand\, aarde\, poeder of schuim om te blussen, S43.1
no: Bruk sand\, jord\, pulver eller skum til slukking, S43.1
pt: Para extinção utilizar areia\, terra\, pó ou espuma, S43.1
sv: Släck med sand\, jord\, pulver eller skum, S43.1

en: Never use water, S43.2
de: Kein Wasser verwenden, S43.2
dk: Brug ikke vand, S43.2
es: No usar nunca agua, S43.2
fi: Sammutukseen ei saa käyttää vettä, S43.2
fr: Ne jamais utiliser d'eau, S43.2
it: Non usare acqua, S43.2
nl: Nooit water gebruiken, S43.2
no: Bruk ikke vann, S43.2
pt: Nunca utilizar água, S43.2
sv: Anväd aldrigvatten, S43.2

en: For extinguishing\, use water, S43.3
de: Zum Löschen Wasser verwenden, S43.3

en: For extinguishing\, use dry sand, S43.4
de: Zum Löschen trockenen Sand verwenden, S43.4

en: For extinguishing\, use extinguishing powder or sand, S43.5
de: Zum Löschen Löschpulver oder Sand verwenden, S43.5

en: For extinguishing\, use foam, S43.6
de: Zum Löschen Schaum verwenden, S43.6

en: In case of accident or if you feel unwell\, seek medical advice immediately (show the lable where possible), S45
cs: V případě nehody\, nebo necítíte-li se dobře\, okamžitě vyhledejte lékařskou pomoc (je-li možno\, ukažte toto označení), S45
de: Bei Unfall oder Unwohlsein sofort Arzt hinzuziehen (wenn möglich\, dieses Etikett vorzeigen), S45
dk: Ved ulykkestilfælde eller ved ildebefindende er omgående lægebehandling nødvendig; vis etiketten\, hvis det er muligt, S45
el: Σε περίπτωση ατυχήµατος ή αν αισθανθείτε αδιαθεσία ζητήστε αµέσως ιατρική συµβουλή (δείξτε την ετικέτα αν είναι δυνατό), S45
es: En caso de accidente o malestar\, acúdase inmediatamente al médico (si es posible\, muéstresele la etiqueta), S45
et: Õnnetusjuhtumi või halva enesetunde korral pöörduda arsti poole (võimaluse korral näidata talle etiketti), S45
fi: Onnettomuuden sattuessa tai tunnettaessa pahoinvointia hakeuduttava heti lääkärin hoitoon (näytettävä tätä etikettiä mikäli mahdollista), S45
fr: En cas d'accident ou de malaise\, consulter immédiatement un médecin (si possible lui montrer l'étiquette), S45
hu: Baleset vagy rosszullét esetén azonnal orvoshoz kell fordulni. Ha lehetséges\, a címkét meg kell mutatni, S45
it: In caso di incidente o di malessere consultare immediatamente il medico (se possibile\, mostrargli l'etichetta), S45
lt: Nelaimingo atsitikimo atveju arba pasijutus blogai\, nedelsiant kreiptis į gydytoją (jeigu į manoma\, parodyti šią etiketę), S45
lv: Ja noticis nelaimes gadījums vai jūtami veselības traucējumi\, nekavējoties meklēt medicīnisku palīdzību (ja iespējams\, uzrādīt markējumu), S45
mt: F'każ ta' inċident jew jekk tħossok ma tiflaħx\, ara tabib millewwel (jekk hu possibbli\, urih it-tikketta), S45
nl: Bij een ongeval of indien men zich onwel voelt\, onmiddellijk een arts raadplegen (indien mogelijk hem dit etiket tonen), S45
no: Ved uhell eller illebefinnende er omgående legebehandling nødvendig\, vis etiketten hvis mulig, S45
pl: W przypadku awarii lub jeżeli źle się  poczujesz\, niezwłocznie zasięgnij  porady lekarza – jez˙eli to możliwe\, pokaż etykiete˛, S45
pt: Em caso de acidente ou de indisposição\, consultar imediatamente o médico (se possível mostrar-lhe o rótulo), S45
sk: V prípade nehody alebo ak sa necítite dobre\, okamžite vyhl’adajte lekársku pomoc (ak je to možné\, ukážte označenie látky alebo prípravku), S45
sl: Ob nezgodi ali slabem počutju\, takoj poiskati zdravniško pomoč. (Po možnosti pokazati etiketo), S45
sv: Vid olycksfall\, illamående eller annan påverkan\, kontakta omedelbart läkare. Visa om möjligt etiketten, S45

en: If swallowed\, seek medical advice immediately and show this container or lable, S46
cs: Při požití okamžitě vyhledejte lékařskou pomoc a ukažte tento obal nebo označení, S46
de: Bei Verschlucken sofort ärztlichen Rat einholen und Verpackung oder Etikett vorzeigen, S46
dk: Ved indtagelse\, kontakt omgående læge og vis denne beholder eller etiket, S46
el: Σε περίπτωση κατάποσης ζητήστε αµέσως ιατρική συµβουλή και δείξτε αυτό το δοχείο ή την ετικέτα, S46
es: En caso de ingestión\, acúdase inmediatamente al médico y muéstresele la etiqueta o el envase, S46
et: Kemikaali allaneelamise korral pöörduda viivitamatult arsti poole ja näidata talle kemikaali pakendit või etiketti, S46
fi: Jos ainetta on nielty\, hakeuduttava heti lääkärin hoitoon ja näytettävä tämä pakkaus tai etiketti, S46
fr: En cas d'ingestion\, consulter immédiatement un médecin et lui montrer l'emballage ou l'étiquette, S46
hu: Lenyelése esetén azonnal orvoshoz kell fordulni\, az edényt/ csomagolóburkolatot és a címkét az orvosnak meg kell mutatni, S46
it: In caso d'ingestione consultare immediatamente il medico e mostrargli il contenitore o l'etichetta, S46
lt: Prarijus nedelsiant kreiptis į gydytoją ir parodyti šią pakuotę arba etiketę, S46
lv: Ja norīts\, nekavējoties meklēt medicīnisku palīdzību un uzrādīt iepakojumu vai tā mark¸ ējumu, S46
mt: Jekk jinbela'\, ara tabib mill-ewwel u urih dan il-kontenitur jew it-tikketta, S46
nl: In geval van inslikken onmiddellijk een arts raadplegen en verpakking of etiket tonen, S46
no: Ved svelging\, kontakt lege omgående og vis emballasjen eller etiketten, S46
pl: W razie połknięcia niezwłocznie zasięgnij porady lekarza – pokaż opakowanie lub etykietę, S46
pt: Em caso de ingestão\, consultar imediatamente o médico e mostrar-lhe a embalagem ou o rótulo, S46
sk: V prípade požitia\, okamžite vyhl’adajte lekársku pomoc a ukážte tento obal alebo označenie, S46
sl: Če pride do zaužitja\, takoj poiskati zdravniško pomoč in pokazati embalažo ali etiketo, S46
sv: Vid förtäring kontakta genast läkare och visa denna förpäckning eller etiketten, S46

en: Keep at temperature not exceeding …°C (to be specified by the manufacturer), S47
cs: Uchovávejte při teplotě nepřesahující… °C (specifikuje vý robce), S47
de: Nicht bei Temperaturen über …°C aufbewahren (vom Hersteller anzugeben), S47
dk: Må ikke opbevares ved temperaturer på over …°C (angives af fabrikanten), S47
el: Να διατηρείται σε θερµοκρασία που δεν υπερβαίνει τους… °C (καθορίζεται από τον παραγωγό), S47
es: Consérvese a una temperatura no superior a …°C (a especificar por el fabricante), S47
et: Hoida temperatuuril mitte üle… °C (määrab valmistaja), S47
fi: Säilytettävä alle… C:n lämpötilassa (valmistaja/maahantuoja ilmoittaa lämpötilan), S47
fr: Conserver à une température ne dépassant pas …°C (à préciser par le fabricant), S47
hu: … °C feletti hőmérsékleten nem tárolható (a hőmérsékletet a gyártó határozza meg), S47
it: Conservare a temperatura non superiore a …°C (da precisare da parte del fabbricante), S47
lt: Laikyti ne aukštesnėje negu… °C temperatūroje (nurodo gamintojas), S47
lv: Uzglabāšanas temperatūra nedrīkst pārsniegt… °C (norāda ražotājs), S47
mt: Żomm f'temperatura li ma taqbiżx… °C (ikun speċifikat millmanifattur), S47
nl: Bewaren bij een temperatuur beneden …°C (aan te geven door de fabrikant), S47
no: Må ikke oppbevares ved en temperatur som er høyere enn …°C (angis av produsent eller importør), S47
pl: Przechowywać w temperaturze nieprzekraczającej… °C (określi producent), S47
pt: Conservar a uma temperatura que não exceda …°C (a especificar pelo produtor), S47
sk: Uchovávajte pri teplote nepresahujúcej …°C (teplotu špecifikuje výrobca), S47
sl: Hraniti pri temperaturi\, ki ne presega… °C (temperaturo določi proizvajalec), S47
sv: Förvaras vid en temperatur som inte överstiger …°C (anges av tillverkaren), S47